Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.180

Joint director.

The boards of two or more counties or the legislative bodies of other political subdivisions or special districts may jointly engage a single director of planning and may authorize him or her to employ such other personnel as may be necessary to carry out the joint planning program.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4114; 1963 c 4 s 36.70.180. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 18.]